Massachusetts, session 194th, H2230.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by inserting after section 237 the following section:- 
SECTION 1. Section 237A. (a) Emergency medical service providers, emergency 
departments, state and local law enforcement agencies, sheriffs’ offices, fire departments and 
coroners, when responding to and reporting on fatal and nonfatal opiate overdoses, shall record 
the location where the opiate overdose or overdoses occurred. Emergency medical service 
providers, emergency departments, state and local law enforcement agencies, sheriffs’ offices, 
fire departments and coroners shall submit the location data to the department, pursuant to 
section 237, not less than 24 hours after the fatal or nonfatal opiate overdose or after receiving 
the incident toxicology report. 

of 2 11  (b) The collection, storage and release of location data shall be subject to the 
requirements of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act and the 
regulations adopted in 45 CFR § 160 and 164. 
(c) The center for health information analysis, as established in chapter 12C, in 
consultation with department, shall maintain a public database website for fatal and nonfatal 
opiate overdoses in the commonwealth. The website shall provide a public electronic record of 
the locations where the fatal and nonfatal opiate overdoses occur based on the data collected and 
assembled from emergency medical service providers, emergency departments, state and local 
law enforcement agencies, sheriffs’ offices, fire departments and coroners, which they provide to 
the department. The department shall maintain the fatal and nonfatal opiate overdose location 
data collected by emergency medical service providers, emergency departments, state and local 
law enforcement agencies, sheriffs’ offices, fire departments and coroners. The department shall 
provide the center with a monthly updated data report for the website based on the new data 
collected. 
(d) The department and the center shall not publicly disclose any data containing direct 
personal identification information including: an individual’s name, residence, street address, 
email address, telephone number and social security number. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2024.